California statutes. Business and Professions Code
 same size by symbols or other marks, in a manner that clearly calls attention to the language. In the case of an audio disclosure, “clear and conspicuous” and “clearly and conspicuously” means in a volume and cadence sufficient to be readily audible and understandable.

(4) “Consumer” means any individual who seeks or acquires, by purchase or lease, any goods, services, money, or credit for personal, family, or household purposes.

(5) “Continuous service” means a plan, arrangement, or provision of a contract that contains a free-to-pay conversion or in which a paid subscription or purchasing agreement continues until the consumer cancels the service.

(6) “Free-to-pay conversion” means, in an offer or agreement to sell or provide any goods or services, a provision under which a customer receives a product or service
 for free for an initial period and will incur an obligation to pay for the product or service if they do not take affirmative action to cancel before the end of that period.

(b) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall only apply to a contract entered into, amended, or extended under this article on or after July 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 515, Sec. 1.   (AB 2863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17602.

(a) It is unlawful for any business that makes an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer to a consumer in this state to do any of the following:

(1) Fail to present the automatic renewal offer terms or continuous service offer terms in a clear and conspicuous manner before the subscription or purchasing agreement is fulfilled and in visual proximity, or, in the case of an offer conveyed by voice, in temporal proximity, to the request for consent to the offer. If the offer also includes a free gift or trial, the offer shall include a clear and conspicuous explanation of the price that will be charged after the trial ends or the manner in which the subscription or purchasing agreement pricing will change upon conclusion of the trial.

(2) Charge the consumer’s credit or debit card, or the consumer’s account with a third party, for an automatic renewal or continuous service without first obtaining the consumer’s affirmative consent to the agreement containing the automatic renewal offer terms or continuous service offer terms, including the terms of an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer that is made at a promotional or discounted price for a limited period of time.

(3) Fail to provide an acknowledgment that includes the automatic renewal offer terms or continuous service offer terms, cancellation policy, and information regarding how to cancel in a manner that is capable of being retained by the consumer. If the automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer includes a free gift or trial, the business shall also disclose in the acknowledgment how to cancel, and allow the consumer to cancel,
 the automatic renewal or continuous service before the consumer pays for the goods or services.

(4) Fail to obtain the consumer’s express affirmative consent to the automatic renewal or continuous service offer terms.

(5) Include any information in the contract that interferes with, detracts from, contradicts, or otherwise undermines the ability of consumers to provide their affirmative consent to the automatic renewal or continuous service.

(6) Fail to maintain verification of the consumer’s affirmative consent for at least three years, or one year after the contract is terminated, whichever period is longer.

(7) Misrepresent, expressly or by implication, any material fact related to the transaction, including, but not limited to, the inclusion of an
 automatic renewal or continuous service, or any material fact related to the underlying good or service.

(8) Fail to provide a consumer with a notice, before confirming the consumer’s billing information and as may be required by subdivision (b), that clearly and conspicuously states all of the following:

(A) That the automatic renewal or continuous service will automatically renew unless the consumer cancels.

(B) The length and any additional terms of the renewal period.

(C) The amount or range of costs the consumer will be charged and, if applicable, the frequency of those charges a consumer will incur unless the consumer takes timely steps to prevent or stop those charges.

(D) One or
 more methods by which a consumer can cancel the automatic renewal or continuous service.

(E) If the notice is sent electronically, the notice shall include either a link that directs the consumer to the cancellation process, or another reasonably accessible electronic method that directs the consumer to the cancellation process if no link exists.

(F) Contact information for the business.

(b) A business shall provide a consumer with a notice as specified in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) if either of the following is true, provided that if an automatic renewal offer or a continuous service offer requires a notice under both paragraphs (1) and (2), only the notice specified in paragraph (2) shall be required:

(1) The consumer accepted a free gift or
 trial, lasting for more than 31 days, that was included in an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer or the consumer accepted an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer at a promotional or discounted price, and the applicability of that price was more than 31 days.

(A) The notice shall be provided at least 3 days before and at most 21 days before the expiration of the predetermined period of time for which the free gift or trial, or promotional or discounted price, applies.

(B) An offer shall be exempt from the requirements under this paragraph if the consumer does not enter into the contract electronically and the business has not collected or maintained the consumer’s valid email address, phone number, or another means of notifying the consumer electronically.

(C) For purposes of this
 paragraph, “free gift” does not include a free promotional item or gift given by the business that differs from the subscribed product.

(2) The consumer accepted an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer with an initial term of one year or longer, that automatically renews unless the consumer cancels the automatic renewal or continuous service. In this case, the notice shall be provided at least 15 days and not more than 45 days before the automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer renews.

(c) (1) A business that makes an automatic renewal offer or continuous service offer shall provide a toll-free telephone number, email address, a postal address if the seller directly bills the consumer, or it shall provide another cost-effective, timely, and easy-to-use mechanism for cancellation that shall be described in the acknowledgment specified
 in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(2) (A) Subject to subparagraph (B), if a business provides a mechanism for cancellation by toll-free telephone number, the business shall answer calls promptly during normal business hours and shall not obstruct or delay the consumer’s ability to cancel the automatic renewal or continuous service.

(B) If a consumer leaves a voicemail with a business requesting cancellation, the business shall, within one business day, either process the requested cancellation or call the consumer back regarding the cancellation request.

(d) (1) In addition to the requirements of subdivision (b), a business that allows a consumer to accept an automatic renewal or continuous service offer online shall allow a consumer to terminate the automatic renewal or
 continuous service exclusively online, at will, and without engaging any further steps that obstruct or delay the consumer’s ability to terminate the automatic renewal or continuous service immediately. The business shall provide a method of termination that is online in the form of either of the following:

(A) A prominently located direct link or button which may be located within either a customer account or profile, or within either device or user settings.

(B) By an immediately accessible termination email formatted and provided by the business that a consumer can send to the business without additional information.

(2) The termination requirements of this subdivision apply to the automatic renewal terms and continuous service terms of the contract and the remaining provisions of the contract continue to be
 governed by all applicable laws and regulations.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a business may require a consumer to enter account information or otherwise authenticate online before termination of the automatic renewal or continuous service online if the consumer has an account with the business. A consumer who is unwilling or unable to enter account information or otherwise authenticate online before termination of the automatic renewal or continuous service online shall not be precluded from authenticating or terminating the automatic renewal or continuous service offline using another method pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) For purposes of subdivisions (c) and (d), providing a discount offer or other consumer benefit or informing a consumer of the effect of the cancellation shall not be considered an obstruction or delay, provided that the consumer remains able to cancel
 or terminate the automatic renewal or continuous service, as follows:

(1) If a consumer conveys a request to cancel by telephone, the business may present the consumer with a discounted offer, retention benefit, or information regarding the effect of cancellation, provided that the business first clearly and conspicuously informs the consumer that they may complete the cancellation process at any time by stating that they want to “cancel” or words to that effect. If the consumer states their intention to “cancel” or words to that effect, the business shall promptly process the cancellation and shall not otherwise obstruct or delay the consumer’s ability to cancel.

(2) If a consumer conveys a request to cancel by an online system, the business may display a discounted offer, retention benefit, or information regarding the effects of cancellation, provided that the business
 simultaneously displays a prominently located and continuously and proximately displayed direct link or button entitled “click to cancel,” or words to that effect, with the presentation of the discounted offer, other consumer benefit, or information. If the consumer utilizes this direct link or button, the business shall promptly process the cancellation and shall not otherwise obstruct or delay the consumer’s ability to proceed to cancellation.

(f) The ability to cancel or terminate an automatic renewal or continuous service pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) shall be available to the consumer in the same medium that the consumer used in the transaction that resulted in the activation of the automatic renewal or continuous service, or the same medium in which the consumer is accustomed to interacting with the business, including, but not limited to, in person, by telephone, by mail, or by email. If the activation was by telephone, a telephone
 number that is capable of being retained by the consumer shall be available to the consumer to cancel or terminate the automatic renewal or continuous service. The telephone number shall be clearly and conspicuously displayed on the company’s website, if applicable.

(g) (1) In the case of a material change in the terms of the automatic renewal or continuous service that has been accepted by a consumer in this state, the business shall provide the consumer with a clear and conspicuous notice of the material change and provide information regarding how to cancel in a manner that is capable of being retained by the consumer.

(2) In the case of a change in the fee charged under an existing automatic renewal or continuous service offer that has been accepted by a consumer in this state, including changes the consumer affirmatively consented to in an existing plan
 or arrangement, the business shall provide, no less than 7 days and no more than 30 days before the fee change takes effect, the consumer with both of the following:

(A) A clear and conspicuous notice of the fee change.

(B) Information regarding how to cancel in a manner that is capable of being retained by the consumer.

(h) (1) A business shall send an annual reminder to a consumer under an annual automatic renewal agreement or continuous service agreement with the business in the same medium that resulted in the activation of the automatic renewal or continuous service, or the same medium in which the customer is accustomed to interacting with the business, including, but not limited to, by telephone, mail, or email. For originally in-person or voice-based transactions, the business shall send
 the reminder by telephone, mail, or any internet-based communication.

(2) The reminder sent pursuant to this subdivision shall disclose all of the following:

(A) The product or service to which the automatic renewal or continuous service applies.

(B) The frequency and amount of charges associated with the automatic renewal or continuous service.

(C) The means to cancel the automatic renewal or continuous service.

(i) The requirements of this article shall apply only prior to the completion of the initial order for the automatic renewal or continuous service, except as follows:

(1) The requirements in paragraphs (3) and (8) of
 subdivision (a) may be fulfilled after completion of the initial order.

(2) The requirements in subdivision (b) may be fulfilled after completion of the initial order.

(3) The requirement in subdivision (g) shall be fulfilled prior to implementation of the material change or fee change.

(4) The requirement in subdivision (h) shall be fulfilled annually.

(j) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall only apply to a contract entered into, amended, or extended under this article on or after July 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 515, Sec. 2.   (AB 2863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17603.

In any case in which a business sends any goods, wares, merchandise, or products to a consumer, under a continuous service agreement or automatic renewal of a purchase, without first obtaining the consumer’s affirmative consent as described in Section 17602, the goods, wares, merchandise, or products shall for all purposes be deemed an unconditional gift to the consumer, who may use or dispose of the
 same in any manner he or she sees fit without any obligation whatsoever on the consumer’s part to the business, including, but not limited to, bearing the cost of, or responsibility for, shipping any goods, wares, merchandise, or products to the business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (SB 340)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative December 1, 2010, pursuant to Section 17606.)
-------------------------------------------

17604.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 17534, a violation of this article shall not be a crime. However, all available civil remedies that apply to a violation of this article may be employed.

(b) If a business complies with the provisions of this article in good faith, it shall not be subject to civil
 remedies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (SB 340)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative December 1, 2010, pursuant to Section 17606.)
-------------------------------------------

17605.

The following are exempt from the requirements of this article:

(a) Any service provided by a business or its affiliate where either the business or its affiliate is doing business pursuant to a franchise issued by a political subdivision of the state or a license, franchise, certificate, or other authorization issued by the California
 Public Utilities Commission (CPUC).

(b) Any service provided by a business or its affiliate where either the business or its affiliate is regulated by the CPUC, the Federal Communications Commission, or the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

(c) Any entity regulated by the Department of Insurance.

(d) Alarm company operators, as defined in Section 7590.2, and regulated pursuant to Chapter 11.6 (commencing with Section 7590) of Division 3.

(e) A bank, bank holding company, or the subsidiary or affiliate of either, or a credit union or other financial institution, licensed under state or federal law.

(f) Service contract sellers and service contract administrators regulated by the Bureau
 of Electronic and Appliance Repair pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 9855) of Chapter 20 of Division 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (SB 340)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Section operative December 1, 2010, pursuant to Section 17606.)
-------------------------------------------

17606.

This article shall become operative on December 1, 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 350, Sec. 1.   (SB 340)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Article 9, commencing with Section 17600.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Premium Coupons [17700. - 17702.]

17700.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Coupon” includes certificates, cards, package labels, wrappers, can covers, bottle caps or other and similar devices, which entitle the person holding or delivering or surrendering them to have them exchanged for or redeemed in goods, wares, merchandise, or services of any kind free of charge or for less than the retail price of such goods, wares, merchandise, or services.

(b) “Person” includes persons, firm, firms, corporation and corporations.

(c) “Issue” includes use, distribute, give away, sell and furnish.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 776.)
-------------------------------------------

17701.

It is unlawful for any person to issue coupons unless there shall be specified in or upon such coupons, specifically or by class, the person by whom or with whom such coupon is exchangeable or redeemable, and unless such person specified is either:

(a) The person issuing such coupon

(b) Member or members of an association issuing such coupon which association shall be a bona fide organization in existence for a period of at least six months prior to issuing such coupon. The name and address by street and number of the principal place of business of the association shall also be specified in or upon such coupon

(c) A person engaged in the business of issuing coupons for use or distribution by itself or by other persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

17701.5.

It is unlawful for any person to advertise a price that requires the buyer to send in a coupon to the manufacturer for a cash rebate, unless the price actually paid to the person selling the item is clearly and conspicuously advertised along with the final price with the coupon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 863, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

17702.

Any person violating this chapter is for each offense guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 64.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Trading Stamp Company Act [17750. - 17773.]

17750.

“Trading stamp” means any stamp or similar device issued in connection with the retail sale of merchandise or service, as a cash discount, or for any other marketing purpose, that entitles the rightful holder, on its due presentation for redemption, to receive merchandise, service, or cash.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17751.

“Trading stamp” also means any stamp or similar device issued as a gift or as a consideration in any transaction other than in connection with the retail sale of merchandise or service, by a trading stamp company that also issues those devices in connection with the retail sale of merchandise or service, as a cash discount, or for any other marketing purpose, and that may be redeemed by the rightful holder on the same basis as, or interchangeably with, any trading stamp issued as described in Section 17750.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17752.

“Trading stamp” does not include any redeemable device used by the manufacturer or packer of an article, in advertising or selling the article, or any redeemable device issued and redeemed by a newspaper, magazine, or other publication.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17753.

“Trading stamp” does not include any coupon, ticket, certificate, card, or other similar device prepared by a merchant using that device and distributed by the merchant to his or her customers, if the device is redeemable only by that merchant for, or in connection with, the purchase of specific articles of merchandise carried in his or her stock.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17754.

The Legislature finds and declares that the devices described in Sections 17752, 17753, and 17760 are not employed in connection with improper activities of irresponsible trading stamp companies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17755.

“Trading stamp company” means any person engaged in any manner in distributing trading stamps for retail issuance by others or in redeeming trading stamps for retailers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17756.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or other organization.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17757.

“Organization” means any partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or association.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17758.

“Issue” includes use, distribute, give away, sell, furnish, and licensing that use, distribution, gift, sale or furnishing.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17759.

“Merchant” includes retailer, person dealing in services, or person in a similar capacity.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17760.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to nonprofit merchant organizations that guarantee redemption of trading stamps that are exclusively issued and redeemed by that organization or its members and where all of those members have jointly and severally assumed liability for all stamps so issued and where the redemption is from stock in trade of, or in cash from, any and all members of the organization. The assumption of liability shall be evidenced by a written agreement between the organization and its members setting forth the joint and several liability of the organization and its members for redemption of trading stamps issued by the organization.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17761.

It is unlawful for any person to issue any trading stamp unless the stamp has imprinted on it both of the following:

(a) The name of the trading stamp company that is responsible for the redemption of the stamp.

(b) The redeemable value of the stamp in cents, mills, or fraction of cents.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17762.

Any trading stamp company shall redeem upon presentation any trading stamp that it has issued, either in merchandise, service, or cash, at the option of the rightful holder. However, if the trading stamp company only offers to redeem the trading stamp in cash, the rightful holder of the trading stamp shall not have the option of receiving merchandise or service and shall only receive a cash redemption. Trading stamps shall only be presented for redemption in cash in an amount aggregating not less than one dollar ($1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17763.

It is unlawful for any person to willfully issue or redeem any trading stamp without the consent of the trading stamp company that issued the stamp.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17764.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit any person from redeeming, pursuant to contract, any trading stamps issued on or before December 31, 1997.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17765.

Any person who advertises the giving of trading stamps, or who gives trading stamps, with the sale of any merchandise or service, shall give those stamps, if the purchaser requests them, with the sale of all items of merchandise or service offered for sale at his or her place of business, unless that person advertises that he or she does not give trading stamps on certain items of merchandise or service and designates those items or services in the advertisement or posts a list of those items or services in a conspicuous place in his or her place of business.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17766.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the giving of trading stamps with any sale of merchandise or service when the giving of those stamps or any premium with the particular merchandise or service is specifically prohibited by law or regulation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17767.

If a trading stamp company fails to redeem any of its trading stamps, any rightful holder of those stamps may bring a civil action for damages within three years of the failure to redeem.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17768.

Any merchant who has issued to his or her customers or other persons the trading stamps of any trading stamp company subject to this chapter, and who proposes to discontinue the issuance of the stamps of that company for any reason, shall post a notice in at least 18-point type at every location in his or her establishment where stamps were or are issued, containing at least the following information:

(a) The fact that trading stamps will no longer be issued by the merchant and the date of discontinuance of issuance.

(b) The name and address in this state of the trading stamp company that is responsible for the redemption of those stamps.

(c) The fact that the stamps are redeemable either in merchandise, service, or in cash, at the option of the holder, and stating the cash redemption value of each stamp, and that it is necessary for the holder to present stamps in an amount aggregating not less than one dollar ($1) for redemption in cash.

(d) The notice required by this section shall be posted at least seven days prior to the date on which the issuance of trading stamps is discontinued, and shall remain posted for 30 days after that date.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17769.

No trading stamp company shall cease issuing trading stamps unless it gives written notice at least 90 days prior to that cessation to each merchant that has at any time within one year issued trading stamps that the company is obligated to redeem.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17770.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation, and any superior court of this state shall have jurisdiction in equity on the complaint of any interested person to restrain and enjoin the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17771.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter shall upon conviction be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17772.

Trading stamps issued by a trading stamp company subject to this chapter are exempt from the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 (Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17773.

Nothing in this chapter, nor in this code, shall be construed to require that the cash or merchandise value of trading stamps be stated or set forth on any sign, statement, or other advertising media that either advertises or offers those stamps, or advertises or indicates the price of gasoline or motor fuel, whether on any dispensing apparatus or elsewhere, and that is displayed at or about any place of business offering for sale or selling gasoline or other motor vehicle fuel.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 310, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Fixed Term Installment Contracts [17800. - 17860.]

17800.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Early termination fee” means an additional fee charged to a consumer as a result of a consumer’s election to apply a term or clause included in the contract that authorizes a consumer to suspend making installment payments and to end access to the good or receipt of the service before the end of the period of time during which installment payments are required to be made by the consumer.

(b) “Fixed term installment contract” means any contract for the sale of goods or the furnishing of services by a seller to a consumer for a deferred
 payment price payable in installments required to be made by the consumer during a fixed period of time until the price is paid in full.

(c) “Good” and “service” include tangible and intangible goods, including digital software.

(d) “Terminate” means that the consumer has elected to apply a term or clause included in the contract that authorizes a consumer to suspend making installment payments and to end access to the good or receipt of the service. “Terminate” does not include a general failure of a consumer to perform an obligation of the contract, including a failure to make installment payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 557, Sec. 1.   (AB 483)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17810.

(a) A seller that uses a fixed term installment contract entered into or modified on or after August 1, 2026, shall not charge a fee to a consumer who terminates the fixed term installment contract unless, at the time of entering the initial contract, the contract includes a clear and conspicuous written disclosure of either of the following, which shall be viewable by the consumer without reliance upon a tooltip, additional hyperlink, or any other feature that requires additional user interaction:

(1) The total cost of the early termination fee.

(2) The formula used to calculate the early termination
 fee and the highest possible early termination fee under the contract.

(b) A provider of broadband internet access service on its own, or as part of a bundle, that complies with federal broadband consumer requirements, including the broadband consumer label, codified in 47 C.F.R. Sec. 8.2(a), and its affiliates and subsidiaries, shall be deemed compliant with this section for all services sold on their own or as part of that bundle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 557, Sec. 1.   (AB 483)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17820.

A seller that uses a fixed term installment contract entered into or modified on or after August 1, 2026, shall not charge an early termination fee or any similar fee in an amount greater than 30 percent of the total sum for which the consumer is obligated under the fixed term installment contract, exclusive of the application of the termination fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 557, Sec. 1.   (AB 483)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17830.

This chapter shall not be interpreted to prohibit a contract from requiring the return of a good if the fixed term installment contract is terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 557, Sec. 1.   (AB 483)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17840.

This chapter shall not be interpreted to prevent a buyer from paying the full remaining balance of a fixed term installment contract before its maturity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 557, Sec. 1.   (AB 483)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17850.

(a) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to a fixed term installment contract that is regulated by state or federal law providing greater protections to consumers than those provided by this chapter, including, but not limited to, a prohibition on early termination fees or a lower limit on early termination fee amounts.

(b) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to a home improvement contract, as defined in Section 7151.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 557, Sec. 1.   (AB 483)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17860.

Any waiver of the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 557, Sec. 1.   (AB 483)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Fictitious Business Names [17900. - 17930.]

17900.

(a) (1) The purpose of this section is to protect those dealing with individuals or partnerships doing business under fictitious names, and it is not intended to confer any right or advantage on individuals or firms that fail to comply with the law. The filing of a fictitious business name certificate is designed to make available to the public the identities of persons doing business under the fictitious name.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or impede the rebuttable presumption described in Section 14411.

(b) As used in this chapter,
 “fictitious business name” means:

(1) In the case of an individual, a name that does not include the surname of the individual or a name that suggests the existence of additional owners, as described in subdivision (c).

(2) In the case of a partnership or other association of persons, other than a limited partnership that has filed a certificate of limited partnership with the California Secretary of State pursuant to Section 15902.01 of the Corporations Code, a foreign limited partnership that has filed an application for registration with the California Secretary of State pursuant to Section 15909.02 of the Corporations Code, a registered limited liability partnership that has filed a registration pursuant to Section 16953 of the Corporations Code, or a foreign limited liability
 partnership that has filed an application for registration pursuant to Section 16959 of the Corporations Code, a name that does not include the surname of each general partner or a name that suggests the existence of additional owners, as described in subdivision (c) and in Section 17901.

(3) In the case of a domestic or foreign corporation, any name other than the corporate name stated in its articles of incorporation filed with the California Secretary of State, in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 17910.5.

(4) In the case of a limited partnership that has filed a certificate of limited partnership with the California Secretary of State pursuant to Section 15902.01 of the Corporations Code and in the case of a foreign limited partnership that has filed an application for
 registration with the California Secretary of State pursuant to Section 15902.02 of the Corporations Code, any name other than the name of the limited partnership as on file with the California Secretary of State.

(5) In the case of a limited liability company, any name other than the name stated in its articles of organization and in the case of a foreign limited liability company that has filed an application for registration with the California Secretary of State pursuant to Section 17708.02 of the Corporations Code, any name other than the name of the limited liability company as on file with the California Secretary of State, in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 17910.5.

(c) A name that suggests the existence of additional owners within the meaning of
 subdivision (b) is one that includes such words as “Company,” “& Company,” “& Son,” “& Sons,” “& Associates,” “Brothers,” and the like, but not words that merely describe the business being conducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 2.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17901.

As used in this chapter, “general partner” means:

(a) In the case of a partnership, a general partner, as defined in Section 15901.02 of the Corporations Code.

(b) In the case of an unincorporated association other than a partnership, a person interested in the business of the association whose liability with respect to the association is substantially the same as that of a general partner, as defined in Section 15901.02 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 400, Sec. 17.   (SB 1467)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17901.5.

As used in this chapter, “manager” means a manager of a limited liability company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

17902.

As used in this chapter, “person” includes individuals, limited liability companies, partnerships and other associations, and corporations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

17903.

As used in this chapter, “registrant” means a person or entity who is filing or has filed a fictitious business name statement, and who is the legal owner of the business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 716, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

17905.
